Washington statutes.
RCW 43.334.040

Departmental divisions.

If necessary, the department may be subdivided into divisions. Except as otherwise specified or as federal requirements may differently require, divisions shall be established and organized in accordance with plans to be prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In preparing the plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient public management and to improve programs.

[ 2005 c 333 s 4.]